Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.330

Legislative oral history committee—Duties.

The legislative oral history committee shall have the following responsibilities:

(1) To select appropriate oral history interview candidates and subjects;

(2) To select transcripts or portions of transcripts, and related historical material, for publication;

(3) To advise the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives on the format and length of individual interview series and on appropriate issues and subjects for related series of interviews;

(4) To advise the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives on the appropriate subjects, format, and length of interviews and on the process for conducting oral history interviews;

(5) To advise the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives on joint programs and activities with state universities, colleges, museums, and other groups conducting oral histories; and

(6) To advise the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives on other aspects of the administration of the oral history program and on the conduct of individual interview projects.

[ 2008 c 222 s 5; 1991 c 237 s 3. Formerly RCW 43.07.240.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2008 c 222: See note following RCW 44.04.320.

Effective date—1991 c 237: See note following RCW 44.04.320.